Alaska statutes. Title 33. Probation, Prisons, Pardons, and Prisoners.
Article 1. Remission of Sentences.

Sec. 33.20.010.
Computation of good time.

Notwithstanding AS

12.55.125(f)(3)

and

12.55.125(g)(3)

, a prisoner convicted of an offense against the state or a political subdivision of the state and sentenced to a term of imprisonment that exceeds three days is entitled to a deduction of one-third of the term of imprisonment rounded off to the nearest day if the prisoner follows the rules of the correctional facility in which the prisoner is confined. A prisoner is not eligible for a good time deduction if the prisoner has been sentenced

to a mandatory 99-year term of imprisonment under AS

12.55.125(a)

after June 27, 1996;

to a definite term under AS

12.55.125(l)

;

for a sexual felony under AS

12.55.125(i)

and has one or more prior sexual felony convictions as determined under AS

12.55.145(a)(4)

; or

that is an unclassified or a class A felony; or

for an unclassified felony under AS

11.41.100

or

11.41.110

.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 7 SLA 1996.]

A prisoner may not be awarded a good time deduction under (a) of this section for any period spent in a treatment program, in a private residence, or on electronic monitoring.

History.

(§ 1 ch 107 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 1986; am §§ 15, 18 ch 7 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 90 SLA 2003; am § 31 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 33 ch 43 SLA 2013; am §§
153, 154 ch 36 SLA 2016; am §§
118, 119 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2013 (SB 22), see 2013 Senate Journal 38 — 39.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(d)(12) and (r), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For discipline, see 22 AAC 5, art. 6.

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (a)(3), added the (A) and (B) designations, added (a)(3)(B), and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (a)(4), and made a related change; effective July 12, 2016, rewrote (c).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, substituted “for an unclassified felony under AS

11.41.100

or

11.41.110

” for “to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 10 days for a technical violation of AS

12.55.110(c)

or AS

33.16.215

” in (a)(4); and repealed and reenacted (c).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 46(a), ch. 43, SLA 2013, the 2013 changes to (a) of this section apply to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2013.

Section 142(b),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to this section apply “to sentences imposed on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Authority exists to both award and forfeit statutory good time for pretrial detainees. February 18, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

A prisoner incarcerated for failure to complete community work service should receive credit for good time during the subsequent incarceration. October 27, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 33.20.020.
Good time.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 33.20.030.
Discharge.

A prisoner shall be released at the expiration of the term of sentence less the time deducted for good conduct.
A certificate of deduction shall be entered on the commitment by the warden, keeper, or the commissioner.

History.

(§ 3 ch 107 SLA 1960)

Sec. 33.20.040.
Released prisoner.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a prisoner released under AS

33.20.030

shall be released on mandatory parole to the custody and jurisdiction of the parole board under AS 33.16, until the expiration of the maximum term to which the prisoner was sentenced, if the term or terms of imprisonment are two years or more. However, a prisoner released on mandatory parole may be discharged under AS

33.16.210

before the expiration of the term. A prisoner who was sentenced to a term or terms of imprisonment of less than two years shall be unconditionally discharged from mandatory parole.

This section does not prevent delivery of a prisoner to the authorities of a state or the United States entitled to the custody of the prisoner.

If a prisoner’s sentence includes a residual period of probation, the probationary period shall run concurrently with a period of mandatory parole for that sentence and the prisoner shall be under the concurrent jurisdiction of the court and the parole board. Nothing in this section precludes both the court and the parole board from revoking the prisoner’s probation and mandatory parole for the same conduct. A period of imprisonment resulting from the revocation of probation or mandatory parole may be imposed consecutively in the discretion of the court or the parole board.

History.

(§ 4 ch 107 SLA 1960; am §§ 3, 4 ch 88 SLA 1985; am §§ 8, 9 ch 77 SLA 1987)

Administrative Code. —

For mandatory parole release and revocation, see 22 AAC 20, art. 7.

Sec. 33.20.050.
Forfeiture for offense.

If during the term of imprisonment a prisoner commits an offense or violates the rules of the correctional facility, all or part of the prisoner’s good time may be forfeited under regulations adopted by the commissioner of corrections. The amount of good time forfeited shall be related to the severity of the offense or rule violation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 107 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 11 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For classification, see 22 AAC 5, art. 4.

For discipline, see 22 AAC 5, art. 6.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Authority exists to both award and forfeit statutory good time for pretrial detainees. February 18, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 33.20.060.
Restoration of forfeited good time.

The commissioner of corrections may restore all or a portion of a prisoner’s forfeited good time, under regulations adopted by the commissioner, if the prisoner demonstrates progress in faithfully observing the rules of the correctional facility in which the prisoner is confined. The amount of forfeited good time restored by the commissioner shall be related to the severity of the offense or rule violation committed by the prisoner and the length of time of good conduct that followed the offense or rule violation.

History.

(§ 6 ch 107 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 11 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For discipline, see 22 AAC 5, art. 6.